Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.125

Assessment on cherries in excess of the fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135 RCW—Washington tree fruit research commission.

The Washington tree fruit research commission may raise the assessment on cherries in excess of the fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135 RCW from the assessment of two dollars per ton in effect under chapter 16-560 WAC on July 1, 1995, to four dollars per ton. The commission may also establish an additional assessment on all tree fruits under RCW 15.26.155 of not more than eight cents per ton.

The assessment limits established by this section are set solely to provide prior legislative authority for the purposes of RCW 43.135.055 and may not be construed as providing a limitation on the authority of the tree fruit research commission to alter assessments in any manner not limited by RCW 43.135.055. However, any alteration in assessments made under the authority of this section shall be made in compliance with the procedural requirements established by this chapter for altering or amending such assessments.

[ 1995 c 109 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 109: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1995 c 109 s 3.]